tr: Motor yatağı gövdesi: 0,010 inç büyük boy (0,25 mm); 0,010 inç küçük boy (0,25 mm); 0,020 inç büyük boy (0,50 mm); 0,020 inç küçük boy (0,50 mm); 0,030 inç büyük boy (0,75 mm); 0,030 inç küçük boy (0,75 mm); 0,040 inç büyük boy (1,00 mm); 0,040 inç küçük boy (1,00 mm); Standart (STD); Diğer
hu: Motorcsapágy mérete: 0,010 in túlméret (0,25 mm); 0,010 in alulméret (0,25 mm); 0,020 in túlméret (0,50 mm); 0,020 in alulméret (0,50 mm); 0,030 in túlméret (0,75 mm); 0,030 in alulméret (0,75 mm); 0,040 in túlméret (1,00 mm); 0,040 in alulméret (1,00 mm); Alapméret (STD); Egyéb
pl: Rozmiar łożyska silnika: 0,010 cala nadwymiarowe (0,25 mm); 0,010 cala podwymiarowe (0,25 mm); 0,020 cala nadwymiarowe (0,50 mm); 0,020 cala podwymiarowe (0,50 mm); 0,030 cala nadwymiarowe (0,75 mm); 0,030 cala podwymiarowe (0,75 mm); 0,040 cala nadwymiarowe (1,00 mm); 0,040 cala podwymiarowe (1,00 mm); Standardowe (STD); Inne
sv: Motorlagerstorlek: 0,010 tum överdimension (0,25 mm); 0,010 tum underdimension (0,25 mm); 0,020 tum överdimension (0,50 mm); 0,020 tum underdimension (0,50 mm); 0,030 tum överdimension (0,75 mm); 0,030 tum underdimension (0,75 mm); 0,040 tum överdimension (1,00 mm); 0,040 tum underdimension (1,00 mm); Standard (STD); Annat
sl-SI: Velikost ležaja motorja: Nadmera 0,010 in (0,25 mm); Podmera 0,010 in (0,25 mm); Nadmera 0,020 in (0,50 mm); Podmera 0,020 in (0,50 mm); Nadmera 0,030 in (0,75 mm); Podmera 0,030 in (0,75 mm); Nadmera 0,040 in (1,00 mm); Podmera 0,040 in (1,00 mm); Standardno (STD); Drugo
nb: Størrelse på motorlager: 0,010 tommer overdimensjon (0,25 mm); 0,010 tommer underdimensjon (0,25 mm); 0,020 tommer overdimensjon (0,50 mm); 0,020 tommer underdimensjon (0,50 mm); 0,030 tommer overdimensjon (0,75 mm); 0,030 tommer underdimensjon (0,75 mm); 0,040 tommer overdimensjon (1,00 mm); 0,040 tommer underdimensjon (1,00 mm); Standard (STD); Annet
ja: エンジンベアリングサイズ: 0.010インチ オーバーサイズ (0.25 mm); 0.010インチ アンダーサイズ (0.25 mm); 0.020インチ オーバーサイズ (0.50 mm); 0.020インチ アンダーサイズ (0.50 mm); 0.030インチ オーバーサイズ (0.75 mm); 0.030インチ アンダーサイズ (0.75 mm); 0.040インチ オーバーサイズ (1.00 mm); 0.040インチ アンダーサイズ (1.00 mm); スタンダード (STD); その他
nl: Motorlager maat: 0,010 in overmaat (0,25 mm); 0,010 in ondermaat (0,25 mm); 0,020 in overmaat (0,50 mm); 0,020 in ondermaat (0,50 mm); 0,030 in overmaat (0,75 mm); 0,030 in ondermaat (0,75 mm); 0,040 in overmaat (1,00 mm); 0,040 in ondermaat (1,00 mm); Standaard (STD); Overig
lt-LT: Variklio guolio dydis: 0,010 col. didesnis (0,25 mm); 0,010 col. mažesnis (0,25 mm); 0,020 col. didesnis (0,50 mm); 0,020 col. mažesnis (0,50 mm); 0,030 col. didesnis (0,75 mm); 0,030 col. mažesnis (0,75 mm); 0,040 col. didesnis (1,00 mm); 0,040 col. mažesnis (1,00 mm); Standartinis (STD); Kita
vi: Kích thước ổ trục động cơ: Quá cỡ 0,010 in (0,25 mm); Dưới cỡ 0,010 in (0,25 mm); Quá cỡ 0,020 in (0,50 mm); Dưới cỡ 0,020 in (0,50 mm); Quá cỡ 0,030 in (0,75 mm); Dưới cỡ 0,030 in (0,75 mm); Quá cỡ 0,040 in (1,00 mm); Dưới cỡ 0,040 in (1,00 mm); Tiêu chuẩn (STD); Khác
ko: 엔진 베어링 규격: 0.010인치 오버사이즈(0.25mm); 0.010인치 언더사이즈(0.25mm); 0.020인치 오버사이즈(0.50mm); 0.020인치 언더사이즈(0.50mm); 0.030인치 오버사이즈(0.75mm); 0.030인치 언더사이즈(0.75mm); 0.040인치 오버사이즈(1.00mm); 0.040인치 언더사이즈(1.00mm); 표준(STD); 기타
hr-HR: Veličina ležaja motora: Nadmjera 0,010 in (0,25 mm); Podmjera 0,010 in (0,25 mm); Nadmjera 0,020 in (0,50 mm); Podmjera 0,020 in (0,50 mm); Nadmjera 0,030 in (0,75 mm); Podmjera 0,030 in (0,75 mm); Nadmjera 0,040 in (1,00 mm); Podmjera 0,040 in (1,00 mm); Standardno (STD); Ostalo
de: Größe des Motorlagers: 0,010 Zoll Übermaß (0,25 mm); 0,010 Zoll Untermaß (0,25 mm); 0,020 Zoll Übermaß (0,50 mm); 0,020 Zoll Untermaß (0,50 mm); 0,030 Zoll Übermaß (0,75 mm); 0,030 Zoll Untermaß (0,75 mm); 0,040 Zoll Übermaß (1,00 mm); 0,040 Zoll Untermaß (1,00 mm); Standard (STD); Sonstige
el: Μέγεθος ρουλεμάν κινητήρα: 0,010 in υπερμέγεθες (0,25 mm); 0,010 in υπομέγεθες (0,25 mm); 0,020 in υπερμέγεθες (0,50 mm); 0,020 in υπομέγεθες (0,50 mm); 0,030 in υπερμέγεθες (0,75 mm); 0,030 in υπομέγεθες (0,75 mm); 0,040 in υπερμέγεθες (1,00 mm); 0,040 in υπομέγεθες (1,00 mm); Κανονικό (STD); Άλλο
pt-BR: Tamanho do rolamento do motor: 0,010 pol. de sobremedida (0,25 mm); 0,010 pol. de submedida (0,25 mm); 0,020 pol. de sobremedida (0,50 mm); 0,020 pol. de submedida (0,50 mm); 0,030 pol. de sobremedida (0,75 mm); 0,030 pol. de submedida (0,75 mm); 0,040 pol. de sobremedida (1,00 mm); 0,040 pol. de submedida (1,00 mm); Padrão (STD); Outro
en: Engine bearing size: 0.010 in oversize (0.25 mm); 0.010 in undersize (0.25 mm); 0.020 in oversize (0.50 mm); 0.020 in undersize (0.50 mm); 0.030 in oversize (0.75 mm); 0.030 in undersize (0.75 mm); 0.040 in oversize (1.00 mm); 0.040 in undersize (1.00 mm); Standard (STD); Other
pt-PT: Rolamento do motor: Sobredimensionado 0,010 pol. (0,25 mm); Subdimensionado 0,010 pol. (0,25 mm); Sobredimensionado 0,020 pol. (0,50 mm); Subdimensionado 0,020 pol. (0,50 mm); Sobredimensionado 0,030 pol. (0,75 mm); Subdimensionado 0,030 pol. (0,75 mm); Sobredimensionado 0,040 pol. (1,00 mm); Subdimensionado 0,040 pol. (1,00 mm); Padrão (STD); Outro
zh-TW: 引擎軸承尺寸: 加大 0.010 英吋 (0.25 公釐); 縮小 0.010 英吋 (0.25 公釐); 加大 0.020 英吋 (0.50 公釐); 縮小 0.020 英吋 (0.50 公釐); 加大 0.030 英吋 (0.75 公釐); 縮小 0.030 英吋 (0.75 公釐); 加大 0.040 英吋 (1.00 公釐); 縮小 0.040 英吋 (1.00 公釐); 標準 (STD); 其他
fi: Moottorin laakerin koko: 0,010 tuuman ylikoko (0,25 mm); 0,010 tuuman alikoko (0,25 mm); 0,020 tuuman ylikoko (0,50 mm); 0,020 tuuman alikoko (0,50 mm); 0,030 tuuman ylikoko (0,75 mm); 0,030 tuuman alikoko (0,75 mm); 0,040 tuuman ylikoko (1,00 mm); 0,040 tuuman alikoko (1,00 mm); Vakio (STD); Muu
bg-BG: Размер на лагера на двигателя: 0,010 инча увеличен (0,25 mm); 0,010 инча намален (0,25 mm); 0,020 инча увеличен (0,50 mm); 0,020 инча намален (0,50 mm); 0,030 инча увеличен (0,75 mm); 0,030 инча намален (0,75 mm); 0,040 инча увеличен (1,00 mm); 0,040 инча намален (1,00 mm); Стандартен (STD); Друго
ru: Размер подшипника двигателя: Увеличенный на 0,010 дюйма (0,25 мм); Уменьшенный на 0,010 дюйма (0,25 мм); Увеличенный на 0,020 дюйма (0,50 мм); Уменьшенный на 0,020 дюйма (0,50 мм); Увеличенный на 0,030 дюйма (0,75 мм); Уменьшенный на 0,030 дюйма (0,75 мм); Увеличенный на 0,040 дюйма (1,00 мм); Уменьшенный на 0,040 дюйма (1,00 мм); Стандартный (STD); Другое
th: ขนาดตลับลูกปืนเครื่องยนต์: โอเวอร์ไซส์ 0.010 นิ้ว (0.25 มม.); อันเดอร์ไซส์ 0.010 นิ้ว (0.25 มม.); โอเวอร์ไซส์ 0.020 นิ้ว (0.50 มม.); อันเดอร์ไซส์ 0.020 นิ้ว (0.50 มม.); โอเวอร์ไซส์ 0.030 นิ้ว (0.75 มม.); อันเดอร์ไซส์ 0.030 นิ้ว (0.75 มม.); โอเวอร์ไซส์ 0.040 นิ้ว (1.00 มม.); อันเดอร์ไซส์ 0.040 นิ้ว (1.00 มม.); มาตรฐาน (STD); อื่นๆ
cs: Velikost ložiska motoru: Nadměrné 0,010 in (0,25 mm); Podměrné 0,010 in (0,25 mm); Nadměrné 0,020 in (0,50 mm); Podměrné 0,020 in (0,50 mm); Nadměrné 0,030 in (0,75 mm); Podměrné 0,030 in (0,75 mm); Nadměrné 0,040 in (1,00 mm); Podměrné 0,040 in (1,00 mm); Standardní (STD); Jiné
fr: Cote du coussinet moteur: Surdimensionné de 0,010 po (0,25 mm); Sous-dimensionné de 0,010 po (0,25 mm); Surdimensionné de 0,020 po (0,50 mm); Sous-dimensionné de 0,020 po (0,50 mm); Surdimensionné de 0,030 po (0,75 mm); Sous-dimensionné de 0,030 po (0,75 mm); Surdimensionné de 0,040 po (1,00 mm); Sous-dimensionné de 0,040 po (1,00 mm); Standard (STD); Autre
ro-RO: Dimensiunile rulmentului motorului: Supradimensionare de 0,010 in (0,25 mm); Subdimensionare de 0,010 in (0,25 mm); Supradimensionare de 0,020 in (0,50 mm); Subdimensionare de 0,020 in (0,50 mm); Supradimensionare de 0,030 in (0,75 mm); Subdimensionare de 0,030 in (0,75 mm); Supradimensionare de 0,040 in (1,00 mm); Subdimensionare de 0,040 in (1,00 mm); Standard (STD); Altele
da: Motorlejestørrelse: 0,010 in overstørrelse (0,25 mm); 0,010 in understørrelse (0,25 mm); 0,020 in overstørrelse (0,50 mm); 0,020 in understørrelse (0,50 mm); 0,030 in overstørrelse (0,75 mm); 0,030 in understørrelse (0,75 mm); 0,040 in overstørrelse (1,00 mm); 0,040 in understørrelse (1,00 mm); Standard (STD); Andet
it: Dimensioni del cuscinetto del motore: Maggiorato di 0,010 pollici (0,25 mm); Minorato di 0,010 pollici (0,25 mm); Maggiorato di 0,020 pollici (0,50 mm); Minorato di 0,020 pollici (0,50 mm); Maggiorato di 0,030 pollici (0,75 mm); Minorato di 0,030 pollici (0,75 mm); Maggiorato di 0,040 pollici (1,00 mm); Minorato di 0,040 pollici (1,00 mm); Standard (STD); Altro
sk-SK: Veľkosť ložiska motora: Nadrozmerné o 0,010 palca (0,25 mm); Podrozmerné o 0,010 palca (0,25 mm); Nadrozmerné o 0,020 palca (0,50 mm); Podrozmerné o 0,020 palca (0,50 mm); Nadrozmerné o 0,030 palca (0,75 mm); Podrozmerné o 0,030 palca (0,75 mm); Nadrozmerné o 0,040 palca (1,00 mm); Podrozmerné o 0,040 palca (1,00 mm); Štandardné (STD); Iné
zh-CN: 发动机轴承尺寸: 加大 0.010 英寸（0.25 毫米）; 减小 0.010 英寸（0.25 毫米）; 加大 0.020 英寸（0.50 毫米）; 减小 0.020 英寸（0.50 毫米）; 加大 0.030 英寸（0.75 毫米）; 减小 0.030 英寸（0.75 毫米）; 加大 0.040 英寸（1.00 毫米）; 减小 0.040 英寸（1.00 毫米）; 标准（STD）; 其他
es: Tamaño del cojinete del motor: 0.010 in de sobremedida (0,25 mm); 0.010 in de submedida (0,25 mm); 0.020 in de sobremedida (0,50 mm); 0.020 in de submedida (0,50 mm); 0.030 in de sobremedida (0,75 mm); 0.030 in de submedida (0,75 mm); 0.040 in de sobremedida (1,00 mm); 0.040 in de submedida (1,00 mm); Estándar (STD); Otro